North Dakota, session 69, SB2118.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 24-03-08 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
24-03-08. DeterminationsAppeals of surface water flow and appropriate highway
construction.
Whenever and wherever
1. If petitioned by a majority of landowners in an area affected by a stream crossing
discharge or requested by the applicable board of county commissioners, board of
township supervisors, or water resource board, the department of water resources
shall review the design of a stream crossing discharge if a highway under the
supervision, control, and jurisdiction of the department or under the supervision,
control, and jurisdiction of the, a board of county commissioners of any county, or thea
board of township supervisors has been or will beis newly constructed or
reconstructed over a watercourse or drawwaterway into which flow surface waters
from farmlands,flow. A petitioning or requesting party under this subsection must be
aggrieved by the placement of a stream crossing discharge before filing a petition or a
request.
2. As part of the review, the department of water resources, upon petition of the majority
of landowners of the area affected or at the request of the board of county
commissioners, township supervisors, or a water resource board, shall determine, as
nearly as practicable, the design discharge that the crossing is required to carry to
meet the stream crossing standards prepared by the department and the department
Page No. 1 25.8106.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
of water resources. When the determination has been made by the department of
water resources, the department of transportation, the board of county commissioners,
or the board of township supervisors, as the case may be, upon notification of the
determination, shall install a culvert or bridge of sufficient capacity to permit the water
to flow freely and unimpeded through the culvert or under the bridge at the time it was
constructed or reconstructed. The department of water resources shall notify the
petitioning or requesting party aggrieved by the effects of the stream crossing
discharge and the appropriate road authority of the results of a review conducted
under this section.
3. The department, county, and township are not liable for any damage to any structure
or property caused by water detained by the highway at the crossing if the highway
crossing has beennewly constructed or reconstructed crossing is in accordance with
the stream crossing standards prepared by the department and the department of
water resources.
Page No. 2 25.8106.01000